Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2. Standards of Quality, Grading, and Sanitary Standards.

§ 3.2-5206.
Board authorized to establish standards and adopt regulations; guidance of State Health Commissioner.

The Board is authorized to establish definitions, standards of quality and identity, and to adopt and enforce regulations dealing with the issuance of permits, production, importation, processing, grading, labeling, and sanitary standards for milk, milk products, market milk, market milk products, and those products manufactured or sold in semblance to or as substitutes for milk, milk products, market milk, market milk products. Regulations concerning the processing and distributing of Grade A market milk and Grade A market milk products shall be adopted with the advice and guidance of the State Health Commissioner. The Board shall adopt regulations for the issuance of the permits referred to in §

3.2-5208

. The Board may require permits in addition to those prescribed by the terms of this article, and shall adopt regulations concerning the conditions under which any additional permits shall be issued.

In adopting any regulation pursuant to this section, the Board may adopt by reference:

Any regulation or part thereof under federal law that pertains to milk or milk products, amending the federal regulation as necessary for intrastate application.

Any model ordinance or regulation issued under federal law, including the Pasteurized Milk Ordinance (Public Health Service/Food and Drug Administration Publication Number 229) and the U.S. Department of Agriculture’s Milk for Manufacturing Purposes and its Production and Processing Recommended Requirements (hereafter the USDA Recommended Requirements), amending it as necessary for intrastate application and to: (i) require milk on each dairy farm to be cooled and stored at a temperature of 40 degrees Fahrenheit or less, but not frozen; (ii) require the use of recording thermometers and interval timers on every milk storage tank installed on a permitted Grade A milk dairy farm; (iii) specify the design, fabrication, installation, inspection, and record keeping necessary for the proper use of such thermometers and timers; (iv) establish a definition for small-scale processors of cheese under the dairy plant processing requirements contained in the USDA Recommended Requirements; and (v) create exemptions for small-scale processors of cheese from the USDA Recommended Requirements regarding processing requirements for dairy plants, provided such exemptions do not compromise food safety.

Any reference, standard, or part thereof relating to milk, milk products, or milk production published by the American Society of Agricultural Engineers, the American Public Health Association, the American Society of Mechanical Engineers, or the International Association of Food Protection.

Any method of analysis relating to milk or milk products including any method of analysis published by the United States Public Health Service, the Association of Official Analytical Chemists, or the American Public Health Association.

Any regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall, unless a later effective date is specified in the regulation, be effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations, who shall publish the regulation as a final regulation in the Virginia Register of Regulations. Neither the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) nor public participation guidelines adopted pursuant thereto shall apply to the adoption of any regulation pursuant to this section. Prior to adopting any regulation pursuant to this section, the Board shall publish a notice of opportunity to comment in the Virginia Register of Regulations. The notice of opportunity to comment shall contain: (i) a summary of the proposed regulation; (ii) instructions on how to obtain the complete text of the proposed regulation; and (iii) the name, address, and telephone number of the agency contact person responsible for receiving public comments. The notice of opportunity to comment shall be made at least 90 days in advance of the last date prescribed in the notice for submittals of public comment. The legislative review provisions of §

2.2-4014

shall apply to the promulgation or final adoption process of regulations under this section. The Board shall consider and keep on file all public comments received for any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections B and C, any permits that may be issued or regulations that may be adopted for the sale or manufacture of cheese from milk from any species not required to be permitted or regulated in intrastate commerce prior to July 1, 2001, under this article, shall be in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) if such regulations or permits apply to persons who manufacture less than 1,000 pounds of such cheese annually.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-345; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-424; 1970, c. 49, § 3.1-530.1; 2001, c. 523; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to exemptions, generally, from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

§ 3.2-5207.
Powers and duties of Commissioner; obstruction unlawful.

The Commissioner shall administer and enforce the regulations adopted pursuant to §

3.2-5206

except as provided in §

3.2-5208

. He is empowered, in the performance of his duties, to enter upon and to have free access to any establishment or area subject to the provisions of this article, or the regulations adopted hereunder. It shall be unlawful for any person to hinder, obstruct, or interfere with the Commissioner in the performance of his duties under this article or under the regulations adopted pursuant to this article.

History.

1970, c. 49, § 3.1-530.3; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5208.
Powers and duties of State Health Commissioner; obstruction unlawful.

The State Health Commissioner, pursuant to the regulations adopted pursuant to §

3.2-5206

, shall issue permits to all plants that process and distribute Grade A market milk and Grade A market milk products. The State Health Commissioner shall also enforce the regulations adopted under §

3.2-5206

in all plants from the point of delivery at the plant to the consumer. He is empowered, in the performance of his duties, to enter upon and to have free access to any establishment or area subject to the provisions of this article, or the regulations adopted hereunder, pertaining to the processing and distribution of Grade A market milk, Grade A market milk products, ungraded milk products, and those products manufactured in semblance to or as substitutes in Grade A market milk and Grade A market milk products plants from the point of delivery at the plant to the consumer. It shall be unlawful for any person to hinder, obstruct, or interfere with the State Health Commissioner in the performance of his duties under this article or under the regulations adopted hereunder.

History.

1970, c. 49, § 3.1-530.4; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5209.
Penalties.

Any violation of the provisions of this article, or the regulations adopted hereunder, or failure to comply with such provisions or regulations, is a Class 1 misdemeanor and punished as provided by law. Each day of such failure or violation shall be a separate offense and shall be punished as such.

History.

1970, c. 49, § 3.1-530.9; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5210.
Civil penalties.

In addition to the penalties prescribed in §

3.2-5209

, any person violating any provision of this article or regulation adopted hereunder may be assessed a civil penalty by the Commissioner for each violation in an amount not to exceed $1,000. Any civil penalty may be in lieu of suspension of a permit issued pursuant to §

3.2-5206

. In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the Commissioner shall give due consideration to: (i) the previous violations committed by the person; (ii) the seriousness of the violation; and (iii) the demonstrated good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance with this article or regulation adopted hereunder after notification of the violation. Any civil penalty shall be in addition to any payment that may be required for the wholesale value of all milk and milk products that must be destroyed as a consequence of such violation.

A civil penalty may be assessed by the Commissioner only after the Commissioner has given the person charged with a violation an opportunity for a public hearing. Where such a public hearing has been held, the Commissioner shall make findings of fact and issue a written decision as to the occurrence of the violation and the amount of the penalty that is warranted, incorporating, when appropriate, an order requiring that the penalty be paid. When appropriate, the Commissioner shall consolidate such hearings with other proceedings pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Any hearing under this section shall be a formal adjudicatory hearing in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). When the person charged with such a violation fails to avail himself of the opportunity for a public hearing, a civil penalty shall be assessed by the Commissioner after the Commissioner determines that a violation has occurred and the amount of the penalty warranted, and issues an order requiring that the penalty be paid.

Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury. The Board shall prescribe procedures for payment of civil penalties. The procedures shall include provisions for a person to consent to abatement of the alleged violation and pay a penalty or negotiated sum in lieu of such penalty without admission of civil liability arising from such alleged violation.

Final orders may be recorded, enforced and satisfied as orders or decrees of a circuit court upon certification of such orders by the Commissioner. Such orders may be appealed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Nothing in this section shall require the Commissioner to institute proceedings for the imposition of civil penalties if the Commissioner considers the violations of this article to be minor. In such cases, the Commissioner may serve a suitable notice of warning in writing when he believes that the public interest will be served by so doing.

The penalty provisions of this section shall not apply to violations of this article or any regulation adopted hereunder with respect to excessive drug residue. The penalty for any such violation shall be as provided in §

3.2-5211

.

History.

2000, c. 993, § 3.1-530.10; 2001, c. 523; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5211.
Excessive drug residue; penalty.

For the purposes of this section:“Dairy farm” means any farm producing Grade A milk or milk for manufacturing purposes.“Excessive drug residue” means drug residue that is: (i) greater than the value specified as a safe level by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration; (ii) equal to or greater than the value specified as the minimum actionable level by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration; or (iii) greater than the value specified as the maximum tolerance level established by federal law. In the event that no safe level, actionable level, or tolerance level for drug residue has been established under federal law, any drug residue shall be deemed to exceed the safe level, minimum actionable level, or tolerance level of drug residue.“Official drug test” means a test: (i) performed by a laboratory that is certified by the Interstate Milk Shippers (IMS) and listed as certified in the IMS List Sanitation Compliance and Enforcement Ratings of Interstate Milk Shippers published by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration; (ii) performed in a laboratory operated by the Commonwealth; or (iii) performed using a method that has been reviewed and accepted by the United States Public Health Service, the Association of Official Analytical Chemists, or the American Public Health Association.

Where an official drug test detects the presence of excessive drug residue in milk produced at a dairy farm, the Commissioner may: (i) assess a civil penalty not to exceed $100 against the operator of the dairy farm; or (ii) order the suspension of any permit issued to the operator pursuant to §

3.2-5206

. No civil penalty shall be assessed under this section unless the operator of the dairy farm has been given the opportunity for an informal fact-finding conference pursuant to §

2.2-4019

. If the matter is not resolved by the informal fact-finding conference or the operator of the dairy farm is dissatisfied with the Commissioner’s decision from the informal fact-finding conference, the operator may request a second informal fact-finding conference. Any such request shall be submitted by the operator to the Commissioner within 30 days after the operator’s receipt of the decision. The Commissioner in his discretion may grant or deny such request.Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Commissioner to hold a formal hearing pursuant to §

2.2-4020

prior to the assessment of a civil penalty or the suspension of a permit pursuant to this section.

If the Commissioner assesses a civil penalty pursuant to this section and the operator of the dairy farm fails to pay the civil penalty in a timely manner, the Commissioner shall suspend any permit issued pursuant to §

3.2-5206

to the operator.

Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury. The Board shall prescribe procedures for payment of civil penalties. The procedures shall include provisions for a person to consent to abatement of the alleged violation and pay a penalty or negotiated sum in lieu of such penalty without admission of civil liability arising from such alleged violation.

History.

2001, c. 523, § 3.1-530.11; 2008, c. 860.